apertium-bn-en.bn.dix
    <pardef n="/যা__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাচ্ছিলাম</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাচ্ছিল</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গেলে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="pcnd" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গেছেন</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাবে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গেল</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গিয়ে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ppst" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাবে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাবে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাবে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গেছে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাবে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গেলি</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাচ্ছে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যান</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যেতে থাকব</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গিয়েছিল</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাবেন</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাচ্ছিল</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাব</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গিয়েছিল</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যেতে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="inf" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গিয়েছিলাম</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যান</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গেলে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যেতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাস</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাই</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাচ্ছি</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p1" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাচ্ছিলি</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গেলেন</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাবে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাওয়া</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ger" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যেতেন</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="hbtl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যা</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাবেন</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="imp" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যেত</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="hbtl" /><s n="impers" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যেতে থাকবে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাচ্ছিস</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাও</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="smpl" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গিয়েছিলেন</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="plprft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাচ্ছিলে</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="past" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যাচ্ছ</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="pres" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p2" /><s n="fam" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>যেতে থাকবেন</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="ft" /><s n="cnt" /><s n="p3" /><s n="pol" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গেছিস</l>
          <r>যা<s n="vblex" /><s n="prft" /><s n="p2" /><s n="infml" /></r>
        </p>

    <e lm="যা">
      <i />
      <par n="/যা__vblex" />
    </e>
